Maine, session 132, LD421.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1103, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 674, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1104, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 674, §4, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1105-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 383, §119 and
affected by §156, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §1105-B, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 383, §119 and
affected by §156, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 17-A MRSA §1105-C, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 383, §119 and
affected by §156, is repealed.
Sec. 6. 17-A MRSA §1105-D, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 383, §119 and
affected by §156, is repealed.
Sec. 7. 17-A MRSA §1106, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 674, §6, is repealed.
Sec. 8. 17-A MRSA §1118-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 485, §3, is
repealed.